Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB264.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901(b)(4) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(b) Title and registration fees.--No fee shall be charged for titling or registration of any of the following:* * *(4) [Vehicles of totally disabled veterans whose disability is certified by the service unit of the armed forces in which the veterans served or by the United States Veterans' Administration as service-connected.] Any vehicle of a veteran whose service-connected disability:(i) Is certified at 100% by the service unit of the 123456789101112131415161718 armed forces in which the veteran served or by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.(ii) Qualifies the veteran for a disability plate and placard under section 1338 (relating to person with disability plate and placard).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0264PN0209 - 2 - 1234567